North Carolina statutes. Chapter 31. Wills.
Article 3. Witnesses to Will.

§ 31-8.1.
Who may witness.

Any person competent to be a witness generally in this State may act as a witness to a will.

History.

1953, c. 1098, s. 15.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Abolishing the Attestation Requirement for Wills,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 541 (1990).

§ 31-9.
Executor competent witness.

No person, on account of being an executor of a will, shall be incompetent to be admitted a witness to prove the execution of such will, or to prove the validity or invalidity thereof.

History.

R.C., c. 119, s. 9; Code, s. 2146; Rev., s. 3119; C.S., s. 4137.

§ 31-10.
Beneficiary competent witness; when interest rendered void.

A witness to an attested written or a nuncupative will, to whom or to whose spouse a beneficial interest in property, or a power of appointment with respect thereto, is given by the will, is nevertheless a competent witness to the will and is competent to prove the execution or validity thereof. However, if there are not at least two other witnesses to the will who are disinterested, the interested witness and the interested witness’s spouse and anyone claiming under the interested witness shall take nothing under the will, and so far only as their interests are concerned the will is void.

A beneficiary under a holographic will may testify to such competent, relevant and material facts as tend to establish such holographic will as a valid will without rendering void the benefits to be received by the beneficiary thereunder.

History.

R.C., c. 119, s. 10; Code, s. 2147; Rev., s. 3120; C.S., s. 4138; 1953, c. 1098, s. 11; 1955, c. 73, s. 2; 2011-344, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, in the last sentence of subsection (a), substituted “the interested witness’s spouse” for “his spouse” and “under the interested witness shall” for “under him shall”; and in subsection (b), substituted “the beneficiary” for “him.”

§ 31-10.1.
Corporate trustee not disqualified by witnessing of will by stockholder.

A corporation named as a trustee in a will is not disqualified to act as trustee by reason of the fact that a person owning stock in the corporation signed the will as a witness.

History.

1949, c. 44.